Louisiana, session 2026, HB1021.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:5004 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§5004. Repayment; exceptions; rules
A. Except as otherwise provided in this Section, a student who receives an
Opportunity, Performance, Honors, or Excellence award shall repay the award
amount that was paid on his behalf to a postsecondary education institution for his
first academic year of enrollment if his award is canceled for failure to meet
requirements for maintaining eligibility as provided in R.S. 17:5041, if he resigns
from the institution, or if he fails to complete a baccalaureate degree by the end of
the spring semester of his fifth academic year of enrollment. Nothing in this
Subsection shall be construed to provide for payment of such an award for more than
eight semesters unless an extension is granted as provided in R.S. 17:5002(E)(1).
B.(1) A student is exempt from the repayment requirement in Subsection A
of this Section if he enrolls at an institution under the supervision and management
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2122 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1021
of the Board of Supervisors of Community and Technical Colleges, referred to in this
Section as "the board of supervisors", and meets all of the following criteria:
(a) He enrolls in an eligible program within twelve months of the last date
of his enrollment at the baccalaureate degree-granting institution.
(b) He enrolls for at least six credit hours per semester or an equivalent
number of clock hours as defined in 34 CFR 600.2, as determined by the board of
supervisors, in a workforce training program.
(c) He successfully completes the eligible program in no more than thirty-six
months.
(2) For purposes of this Subsection, "eligible program" means a program that
results in industry-based certifications, technical diplomas, certificates of applied
science, or associate degrees that align with workforce demand as determined by the
administering agency.
C. The administering agency shall promulgate rules for the implementation
of the provisions of this Section that shall include, at a minimum, the following:
(1)(a) Provision for circumstances under which a student shall be exempt
from the repayment requirement in Subsection A of this Section even if he does not
meet the criteria provided for in Subsection B of this Section.
(b) Provision for circumstances under which a student may be required to
repay a partial amount instead of the full award amount paid on his behalf to a
postsecondary education institution for his first academic year of enrollment.
(2) Provision for all available means of collecting amounts owed and interest
on unpaid amounts.
D. The administering agency shall submit a written report to the House
Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education not later than
December first annually that includes the number of Opportunity, Performance,
Honors, or Excellence award recipients who do not complete a baccalaureate degree
by the end of the spring semester of their fifth year of enrollment, the number of such
students who then enroll in an institution under the supervision and management of
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2122 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1021
the board of supervisors as provided in Subsection B of this Section, the degrees or
other credentials earned by such students at such institutions, repayment outcomes,
and any available workforce outcomes. The administering agency may incorporate
this report into the report required by R.S. 17:5067.
E. The provisions of this Section shall apply to students who graduate from
high school during or after the 2025-2026 school year.